New Jersey, session 222, A4547.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1948, c.16 (C.52:10A-1) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. Members of the Senate and General Assembly shall receive annually, during the term for which they shall have been elected and while they shall hold their office, compensation in the sum of $49,000 beginning with the 2002 legislative year and thereafter [and] , $82,000 beginning with the 2026 legislative year and thereafter, and $0 beginning with the 2028 legislative year and thereafter. [The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the General Assembly, each by virtue of his office, shall receive an additional allowance, equal to 1/3 of his compensation as a member. The compensation herein provided shall be paid to each member upon his qualifying into office as such member, and the additional allowance herein provided to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the General Assembly shall be paid upon his qualifying into office as such officer.] b.    Each member of the Senate and General Assembly shall be provided with an allowance of $150,000 during each annual legislative session for member staff services.  There shall be appropriated annually to the Legislature, from the general revenues of the State, the amount necessary to provide such an allowance to each member. (cf: P.L.2023, c.349, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.